Louisiana, session 2026, SB162.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1203.1(K) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1203.1. Definitions; medical treatment schedule; medical advisory council
* * *
K. After the issuance of the decision by the medical director or associate
medical director of the office, any party who disagrees with the decision may then
appeal by filing a "Disputed Claim for Compensation", which is LWC Form 1008,
within forty-five days of the date of the issuance of the decision. The decision may
be overturned when it is shown, by clear and convincing evidence, the decision of
the medical director or associate medical director was not in accordance with the
provisions of this Section. The party who filed the appeal shall notify the medical
director that he has done so within ten days. The medical director shall compile
and forward the entire record used by the medical director in issuing the
decision to the district hearing office within fifteen days of receiving the notice.
The record shall be made available to the parties upon request. At the hearing
on the appeal, if no evidence in addition to the record is introduced, the
workers' compensation judge shall either affirm or reverse the decision of the
medical director based upon the record that was before the medical director.
If additional evidence that was not submitted to the medical director is
introduced at the hearing, then the judge shall remand the case to the medical
director for consideration of the additional evidence. Following remand, the
medical director shall render a new decision after considering the additional
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 162 ENROLLED
evidence within thirty days of the remand. If the medical director takes no
action within thirty days of the remand order, the judge shall decide the appeal
based upon the entire record.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.